Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.07
Hunger-Free Schools Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Hunger-Free Schools Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education. The fund shall consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. The department shall use the proceeds of the fund to carry out the Hunger-Free Schools Act for public schools. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 7.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.